Utah statutes.
7-9-39.5.   Supervisory merger.

If a credit union is merged with another credit union as a result of a supervisory action under Chapter 2 or 19, the commissioner may permit the surviving credit union to have a field of membership that is larger than a field of membership permitted under Section 7-9-51.



Amended by Chapter 327, 2003 General Session

